Hawaii statutes.
[§11-333] Candidate committee
reports. (a) The candidate and treasurer shall file preliminary, final,
and supplemental reports that shall disclose the following information:

(1) The candidate committee's name and address;

(2) The cash on hand at the beginning of the
reporting period and election period;

(3) The reporting period and election period
aggregate totals for each of the following categories:

(A) Contributions;

(B) Expenditures;

(C) Other receipts; and

(D) Loans;

(4) The cash on hand at the end of the reporting
period; and

(5) The surplus or deficit at the end of the
reporting period.

(b) Schedules filed with the reports shall
include the following additional information:

(1) The amount and date of deposit of each
contribution and the name and address of each contributor who makes
contributions aggregating more than $100 in an election period; provided that
if all the information is not on file, the contribution shall be returned to
the contributor within thirty days of deposit;

(2) The amount and date of deposit of each
contribution and the name, address, occupation, and employer of each
contributor who makes contributions aggregating $1,000 or more during an
election period; provided that if all the information is not on file, the
contribution shall be returned to the contributor within thirty days of
deposit;

(3) All expenditures, including the name and address
of each payee and the amount, date, and purpose of each expenditure.
Expenditures for consultants, advertising agencies and similar firms, credit
card payments, salaries, and candidate reimbursements shall be itemized to
permit a reasonable person to determine the ultimate intended recipient of the
expenditure and its purpose;

(4) The amount, date of deposit, and description of
other receipts and the name and address of the source of each of the other
receipts;

(5) Information about each loan received by the
committee, together with the names and addresses of the lender and each person
liable directly, and the amount of each loan. A copy of the executed loan
document shall be received by the commission by mail or delivery on or before
the filing date for the report covering the reporting period when the loan was
received. The document shall contain the terms of the loan, including the
interest and repayment schedule. Failure to disclose the loan or to provide
documentation of the loan to the commission shall cause the loan to be treated
as a contribution, subject to all relevant provisions of this part;

(6) A description of each durable asset, the date of
acquisition, value at the time of acquisition, and the name and address of the
vendor or contributor of the asset; and

(7) The date of disposition of each durable asset, value
at the time of disposition, the method of disposition, and the name and address
of the person receiving the asset.

(c) The candidate committee shall file a late
contribution report as provided in section 11-338 if the committee receives
late contributions from any person aggregating more than $500. [L 2010, c 211,
pt of §2]

Previous
Vol01_Ch0001-0042F
Next